Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1 COLORADO PUBLIC ASSISTANCE ACT
26-2-107. Verification - record.

Whenever a county department receives an application for public assistance, it shall promptly make a record concerning the circumstances of the applicant to verify the facts supporting the application and shall examine all pertinent records and shall make a diligent effort to examine all records prior to granting assistance. The records include the following:
(1) (a) (I) Whenever a county department receives an application for public assistance, it shall promptly make a record concerning the circumstances of the applicant to verify the facts supporting the application and shall examine all pertinent records and shall make a diligent effort to examine all records prior to granting assistance. The records include the following:

Records of the division of unemployment insurance, including unemployment compensation records;

School attendance records;

Vital statistics records;

Records of the department of revenue.

The county department shall also verify such other information as may be required by the rules and regulations of the state department.

If such information is reasonably available, the verification shall be completed prior to approval of any assistance or for continuation of assistance. The provisions of this paragraph (b) shall not apply to those persons receiving old age pensions, aid to the needy disabled, or aid to the blind during the period for which such assistance is continued.

Within ten working days after a discrepancy relating to a fraudulent or suspected fraudulent act affecting eligibility is discovered, it shall be referred to the appropriate investigatory agency for investigation. The investigatory agency shall take action within thirty days following receipt of the information from the county department.

The county department, the state department, and the officers and authorized employees of each may conduct visits to the home of the applicant at reasonable times, make investigations and require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers by subpoena, and make application to the district court to compel and enforce such attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of such books, records, and papers. Officers and employees designated by the county department or the state department may administer oaths and affirmations.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1182, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-7.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1334, § 4, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1086, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a)(I)(D) amended, p. 1637, § 14, effective June 1.

L. 2012:

IP(1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(I)(A) amended, (HB 12-1120), ch. 27, p. 110, § 27, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments to the introductory portion of subsection (1)(a)(I) and subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) by House Bill 12-1120 (chapter 27, Session Laws of Colorado 2012) was changed from August 8, 2012, to June 1, 2012, by House Bill 12S-1002 (First Extraordinary Session, chapter 2, p. 2432, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.)

26-2-108. Granting of assistance payments and social services - rules.

Upon completion of the verification and record of each application for assistance payments, the county department, pursuant to the rules of the state department, shall determine whether the applicant is eligible for assistance payments, the amount of such assistance payments to be granted, and the date upon which such assistance payments shall begin.

In determining the amount of assistance payments to be granted, due account shall be taken of any income or property available to the applicant and any support, either in cash or in kind, that the applicant may receive from other sources, pursuant to rules of the state department. Effective July 1, 2000, through December 31, 2016, a county may pay families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), as defined in section 26-2-703 (19), an amount that is equal to the state and county share of child support collections as described in section 26-13-108 (1). Such payments shall not be considered income for the purpose of grant calculation. However, such income shall be considered income for purposes of determining eligibility. If a county chooses to pay child support collections directly to a family that is eligible for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), as defined in section 26-2-703 (19), the county shall report such payments to the state department for the month in which they occur and indicate the choice of this option in its performance contract for Colorado works. For the purposes of determining eligibility for public assistance or the amount of assistance payments, compensation received by the applicant pursuant to the "Colorado Crime Victim Compensation Act", part 1 of article 4.1 of title 24, C.R.S., shall not be considered as income, property, or support available to such applicant.

Effective January 1, 2017, and upon the state department's notification to counties that the relevant human services case management systems, including the automated child support enforcement system and the Colorado benefits management system, are capable of directly and efficiently managing the distribution process for the child support pass-through, a county shall pay families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), as defined in section 26-2-703 (19), an amount that is equal to the amount of current child support collections as described in section 26-13-108 (1). Such payments shall not be considered income for purposes of calculating a recipient's basic cash assistance grant pursuant to part 7 of this article. However, such payments, with applicable disregards, shall be considered income for purposes of determining eligibility. The county shall report the amount of the child support payments to the state department for the month in which they occur. For the purposes of determining eligibility for public assistance or the amount of assistance payments, compensation received by the applicant pursuant to the "Colorado Crime Victim Compensation Act", part 1 of article 4.1 of title 24, C.R.S., shall not be considered as income, property, or support available to such applicant.

The general assembly may annually appropriate money to the state department in a separate line item to reimburse the counties for fifty percent of child support collections and the federal government for its share of child support collections that are passed through to temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) recipients pursuant to this subsection (1)(b)(II). The state department shall allocate and distribute the money to the counties. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (1)(b)(II)(B) to the contrary, in any state fiscal year in which the general assembly does not appropriate an amount of money that is at least ninety percent of the total county share of collections passed through to the custodial party after the full federal share is paid pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (1)(b)(II)(B) for the prior fiscal year, the state department shall make all necessary changes to the relevant human services automated systems so that child support payments are not passed through to temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) recipients and a county is not required to, but may, implement the child support pass-through to TANF recipients. The total county share of collections passed through to the custodial party after the full federal share is paid for the fiscal year is determined as of the following December 1, as verified by the state department. If a county elects to implement a child support pass-through in a fiscal year in which no money is appropriated, the county must utilize its own resources and the state automated systems are not required to support the county's implementation.

When the eligibility, amount, and date for beginning assistance payments have been established, the county department shall make an award to or on behalf of the applicant in accordance with rules of the state department, which award shall be binding upon the county and shall be complied with by the county until it is modified or vacated.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (d) and part 7 of this article, assistance payments under public assistance programs shall be paid at least monthly to or on behalf of the applicant upon order of the county department from funds appropriated to the county department for this purpose and pursuant to the rules of the state department.

Assistance in the form of aid to the needy disabled for persons who are disabled as a result of a primary diagnosis of an alcohol use disorder or a substance use disorder related to controlled substances must be paid on the person's behalf to the substance use disorder treatment program in which the person is participating as required pursuant to section 26-2-111 (4)(e)(I) or to the person directly upon the person providing the documentation required pursuant to section 26-2-111 (4)(e)(II).

The county department shall at once notify the applicant and the state department, in writing, of its decisions on assistance payments and the reasons therefor.

The state department, by its rules, shall prescribe procedures for handling applications or requests for social services. Such rules may include, but need not be limited to, the determination of eligibility for social services, the services to be provided, the verification and record, and notice to applicants and the state department.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1182, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-8.

L. 83:

(1)(b) amended, p. 856, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1362, § 25, effective June 28.

L. 96:

(1)(d) amended, p. 992, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1231, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(d)(II) amended, p. 626, § 29, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1711, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1910, § 112, effective August 5.

L. 2015:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 15-012), ch. 285, p. 1153, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(1)(d)(II) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1332, § 218, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

(1)(b)(II)(B) amended and (3) added, (HB 20-1100), ch. 83, p. 335, § 1, effective September 14; (3) repealed, (HB 20-1388), ch. 124, p. 522, § 2, effective September 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

26-2-109. Right to own certain property.

No person otherwise qualified to receive public assistance shall be denied public assistance by reason of the fact that he is the owner of real estate occupied by him as a residence.

No person otherwise qualified shall be denied public assistance by reason of the fact that he is the owner of personal property which is exempt by the laws of Colorado from execution or attachment.

The state department, by its rules and regulations, may establish limitations on the value of real and personal property and other resources, not included in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, which may be available to an applicant or recipient without affecting his eligibility for public assistance.

For public assistance purposes, the value of residential or other real property shall be equal to the actual value of the property, as determined by the county assessor pursuant to article 1 of title 39, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1183, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-9.

L. 87:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1157, § 1, effective May 1.

26-2-110. Repayment not required.

No person shall be required, in order to receive public assistance, to repay or promise to repay the state of Colorado any money properly paid to him or her as public assistance pursuant to the provisions of this article and the rules of the state department; except that the state may recoup interim assistance authorized under section 26-2-206, concerning blind and disabled individuals.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1183, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-10.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1344, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1158, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1232, § 18, effective July 1.

26-2-111. Eligibility for public assistance - rules - repeal.

No person shall be granted public assistance in the form of assistance payments under this article unless such person meets all of the following requirements:

The person is a resident of the state of Colorado or, if a dependent child, the parent or other relatives with whom said child is living is a resident of the state of Colorado or the person is a legal immigrant who would be otherwise eligible in all respects except for citizenship;

The person has insufficient income, property, or other resources to meet his or her needs as determined pursuant to rules and regulations of the state department; except that resource eligibility for the program of aid to the needy disabled shall be as specified in paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of this section, resource eligibility for the program of aid to the blind shall be as specified in subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section, and resource eligibility requirements for the old age pension program shall be as specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section;

The person has not made a voluntary assignment or transfer of property without fair and valuable consideration for the purpose of rendering himself or herself eligible for public assistance under this article at any time within thirty-six months immediately prior to the filing of application for such assistance pursuant to the provisions of this article; or, in the case of a person already receiving public assistance under this article, the person has not made any such transfer during the time the person has been receiving such public assistance; but, if any such assignment or transfer is made during such thirty-six month period or during such time that public assistance is being received, there is a rebuttable presumption that the assignment or transfer was made for such purpose; but, within such period of time, a person may assign or transfer the ownership of real property owned and used as a residence by such person if:

The transfer or assignment is made for reasons other than to become or remain eligible for public assistance under this article;

The primary purpose of the transfer or assignment is not to acquire moneys or profit but is for some other legitimate reason such as estate planning.

Nothing in this paragraph (c) shall be construed to prohibit a person from selling, transferring, or assigning his or her real estate in a bona fide transaction for good and valuable consideration.

The person is not an inmate of a public institution, except as a patient in a public medical institution, or is not a patient in any institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases, or is not a patient in any medical institution as a result of having been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis; but the provisions of this paragraph (d) shall not be applicable to or in any way affect the class of old age pension recipients provided for in subsection (2)(a)(III) of this section.

Old age pension.

Except as provided in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection (2), public assistance in the form of the old age pension shall be granted to any person who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and any one of the following requirements:

The person is a United States citizen or a qualified alien, has attained the age of sixty years or more, and meets the resource eligibility requirements of the federal supplemental security income program; or

Repealed.

The person is an inmate of an institution, not penal in character, maintained by the state or by a municipality therein or county thereof, and the person has attained the age of sixty years or more. The period of confinement as a patient in such institution shall be considered as residence in the state of Colorado.

An applicant or recipient of the old age pension who is otherwise qualified shall not be denied the old age pension by reason of the fact that relatives may be financially able to contribute to his or her support and maintenance; except that income and resources of the spouse of an applicant or recipient of the old age pension or of a sponsor of an applicant or recipient of the old age pension who is a qualified alien shall be considered in determining eligibility pursuant to rules of the state department.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of this paragraph (c), a qualified alien shall not be granted the old age pension under the provisions of this subsection (2) unless it is shown that:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1384), ch. 218, p. 954, § 4, effective January 1, 2014.)

The qualified alien meets the requirements specified in section 26-2-111.8 (2)(a) relating to entry into the United States prior to August 22, 1996, or the requirements specified in section 26-2-111.8 (2)(b) regarding the five-year bar on receipt of benefits; and

The qualified alien meets the requirements specified in section 26-2-111.8 (2)(c) regarding the deeming of sponsor income and resources.

The requirements in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) do not apply to a qualified alien who meets the eligibility criteria for the old age pension in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) if it is determined pursuant to rules of the state department that:

The qualified alien has been abandoned by or is a victim of mistreatment by his or her sponsor or is an abused spouse and would incur a significant financial hardship; or

The qualified alien who does not have a sponsor would have insufficient income to support himself or herself or would otherwise incur a significant financial hardship; or

The person who sponsored the qualified alien's entry into the United States and who satisfied sponsorship financial requirements at the time of initial sponsorship now has insufficient income and resources to meet the needs of the qualified alien.

The requirements in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) do not apply to a qualified alien who meets the eligibility criteria for the old age pension in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) and who is also eligible for federal financial benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal "Social Security Act".

A person who is a member of a household that is receiving public assistance under the Colorado works program pursuant to part 7 of this article shall not be eligible to receive public assistance pursuant to this subsection (2).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 315, § 8, effective April 15, 2010.)

Colorado works program.

By signing an application for the works program created in part 7 of this article, a person assigns, by operation of law, to the state department all rights the applicant may have to support from any other person on his or her own behalf or on behalf of any other family member for whom application is made. For the purposes of this subsection (3), the assignment:

Is effective for current support due and owing during the period of time the person is receiving public assistance under the works program;

Takes effect upon a determination that the applicant is eligible for the works program; and

Shall remain in effect with respect to any unpaid support that accrues under the assignment, up to the amount of the cost of assistance provided.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-053), ch. 137, p. 594, § 1, effective October 1, 2009.)

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (3), and except as provided in section

26-2-108 (1)(b)

(II), effective January 1, 2017, the state department shall pay to the recipient the current child support collected pursuant to the assignment. The state department shall disregard the amount of child support paid to the recipient pursuant to this paragraph (a.5) in calculating the amount of the recipient's basic cash assistance grant pursuant to part 7 of this article. However, such payments, with applicable disregards, shall be considered income for purposes of determining eligibility.

The application shall contain a statement explaining this assignment and the payment to the recipient of child support pursuant to paragraph (a.5) of this subsection (3).

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), assignments made prior to October 1, 2009, may include support arrearages that accrued prior to the date the applicant is determined to be eligible for the works program.

(3.5) (a) Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1232, § 19, effective July 1, 1997.)

Aid to the needy disabled. Public assistance in the form of aid to the needy disabled must be granted to any person who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and all of the following requirements:

He or she has a total disability, as defined by section 26-2-103 (14) and the rules and regulations of the state department, that has lasted or can be expected to last for a period of six months or more or he or she is determined to be disabled and eligible for social security disability insurance benefits under Title II of the social security act.

He or she is eighteen years of age or older.

He or she has applied for supplemental security income benefits and complied with any recommendations for referrals made by the county department except for good cause shown.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b.5) to the contrary, the state department may promulgate rules allowing a county to waive the requirement that a person apply for supplemental security income benefits prior to receiving aid to the needy disabled under such conditions and for such period of time as the state department deems appropriate to ensure that a person has the opportunity to submit a thorough and complete supplemental security income benefits application.

The person is not a member of a household receiving public assistance under the aid to families with dependent children program set forth in this article. For the purposes of this paragraph (c), "household" has the same meaning as "assistance unit" as used in 45 CFR 205.40 (a)(1), as amended.

The provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) notwithstanding, on and after January 1, 1992, a supplemental payment funded by state and county funds shall be paid to households that have received public assistance payments for the month of December 1991, under both the aid to families with dependent children program set forth in this article and the aid to the needy disabled program set forth in this subsection (4). The supplemental payment shall be in an amount as will maintain the household's total income at the same level as in December 1991.

The supplemental payment shall be paid only if the household remains continuously eligible to receive public assistance under both the aid to families with dependent children program set forth in this article and the aid to the needy disabled program set forth in this subsection (4).

He or she meets the resource eligibility requirements of the federal supplemental security income program.

If the applicant is disabled as a result of a primary diagnosis of a substance use disorder, the applicant, as conditions of eligibility, is required to:

Participate in treatment services approved by the behavioral health administration in the state department; and

Demonstrate on a periodic and random basis that he or she remains free of the use of alcohol or any nonprescribed controlled substance on a form verified by the treatment program. Any person whose random test results are positive two times in any three-month period shall be denied eligibility.

A person who is disabled as a result of a primary diagnosis of an alcohol or substance use disorder is not eligible for aid to the needy disabled based upon that primary diagnosis if the person has received aid to the needy disabled based upon such diagnosis for any cumulative twelve-month period in the person's lifetime.

Aid to the blind.

For the purpose of providing public assistance to those not receiving federal financial benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the social security act, public assistance in the form of aid to the blind shall be granted to any person who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and who:

Is blind as defined by section 26-2-103 (3) or is determined to be blind and eligible for social security disability insurance benefits under Title II of the social security act; except that any person who is a member of a household that is receiving public assistance under the aid to families with dependent children program set forth in this article shall not be eligible to receive public assistance pursuant to this subsection (5);

Has applied for supplemental security income benefits and complied with any recommendations for referrals made by the county department except for good cause shown; and

Meets the resource eligibility requirements of the federal supplemental security program.

For the purposes of this subsection (5), "household" has the same meaning as "assistance unit" as used in 45 CFR 205.40 (b)(1), as amended.

The provisions of section 26-2-111.8 shall apply in addition to the provisions of this section in determining the eligibility for public assistance of persons who are not citizens of the United States.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1183, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-11.

L. 75:

(4)(a) amended, p. 889, § 6, effective July 28.

L. 76:

(2)(b) amended, p. 309, § 51, effective May 20.

L. 77:

IP(1)(c), (4)(a), and (5) amended, p. 1344, § 4, effective May 26; (3)(c) to (3)(e) R&RE and (3)(f) repealed, pp. 1339, 1341, §§ 3, 5, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(3)(g) added, p. 281, § 6, effective April 2; (3)(b) amended, p. 426, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(III) amended and (2)(a)(II) repealed, p. 1119, §§ 1, 2, effective May 10.

L. 88:

(2)(c) added, p. 1053, § 2, effective April 16.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(3)(c) to (3)(e) amended and (3.5) added, p. 39, § 5, effective July 25.

L. 90:

(3)(h) added, p. 1358, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 91:

(3)(d) and (3)(e) repealed, p. 1861, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 91, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

IP(2)(a), (4), and (5) amended and (2)(d) added, pp. 92-94, §§ 1-3, effective January 1, 1992.

L. 92:

(3)(h) amended, p. 2143, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

IP(1), (1)(b), (4), and (5) amended, p. 832, § 1, effective May 23; (4)(e) and (4)(f) added, p. 993, § 3, effective May 23; (1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1297, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 97:

(1)(a) amended and (6) added, p. 1252, § 2, effective July 1; (3) and (3.5)(b) amended, p. 1232, § 19, effective July 1; (3)(a) amended, p. 1287, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3)(a)(III) amended, p. 387, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1505, § 49, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(3)(a) amended and (3)(c) added, (SB 09-053), ch. 137, p. 594, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(2)(d) amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 315, § 8, effective April 15; (2)(a) and (2)(c) amended, (HB 10-1384), ch. 218, p. 951, § 1, effective July 1; (2)(b) and (2)(c) amended, (HB 10-1384), ch. 218, p. 954, §§ 3, 4, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2011:

(4)(e)(I) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1169, § 72, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(4)(b.5) amended, (SB 14-012), ch. 248, p. 959, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(3)(a.5) added and (3)(b) amended, (SB 15-012), ch. 282, p. 1154, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

IP(4)(e) and (4)(e)(I) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1333, § 219, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

IP(4) and (4)(f) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 389, § 33, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

IP(4)(e) and (4)(e)(I) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1518, § 84, effective July 1.

26-2-111.1. Eligibility for assistance - immunization of children. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1340, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(3) amended, p. 1040, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(4) added, p. 40, § 6, effective July 25.

L. 97:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 356, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 21, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 665, § 9, effective April 26.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 315, § 9, effective April 15; entire section repealed, (SB 10-068), ch. 160, p. 555, § 6, effective January 1, 2011.

26-2-111.2. Community work experience program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1340, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, pp. 987, 988, §§ 1, 3, effective April 17; (1) amended, p. 1040, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 40, § 7, effective July 25.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 4, effective July 1.

26-2-111.3. Work supplementation program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 988, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(6) added, p. 41, § 8, effective July 25.

L. 90:

(2)(a), (2)(b), and (5) amended, p. 1359, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 1862, § 5, effective July 1.

26-2-111.4. Employment search program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 989, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(5) added, p. 41, § 9, effective July 25.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 1862, § 6, effective July 1.

26-2-111.5. Access to supplemental security income program benefits for old age pension applicants and recipients.

The state department shall require old age pension applicants or recipients who may be eligible for supplemental security income to apply for benefits authorized by Title XVI of the federal social security act and to comply with any recommendations for referrals made by the county department except for good cause shown. With funds appropriated by the general assembly, the state department may develop a statewide cost-effective program to assist old age pension applicants or recipients in obtaining such benefits.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1299, § 2, effective June 1.

26-2-111.6. Old age pension work incentive program.

The state department is authorized to implement a work incentive program for persons receiving old age pension benefits, which program shall be called the old age pension work incentive program. Under this program, a person who is already eligible for and receiving old age pension benefits would be allowed to retain sixty-five dollars of earned income in a month and one-half of the remaining earned income in a month without such moneys being counted as income for purposes of eligibility for the old age pension. In addition, the receipt and retention of such earned income shall not affect the person's eligibility for medical assistance as provided by articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.

and (3) Repealed.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1299, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(3) repealed, p. 899, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 2016, § 97, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) repealed, p. 1910, § 113, effective August 5.

26-2-111.7. Study of old age pension program - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1299, § 2, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1997. (See L. 96, p. 1299.)

26-2-111.8. Eligibility of noncitizens for public assistance.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that passage of the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, requires the states to make certain decisions concerning qualified aliens and their eligibility for certain types of public assistance.

The goal of this section is to recognize that foreign-born legal residents of the state of Colorado contribute to our society by working in our communities, supporting local businesses, and paying taxes and should receive certain types of public assistance for certain types of situations. Moreover, the state goal is to provide the types of assistance that will enhance the state's ability to receive federal financial participation, thereby reducing the ultimate burden on the state and local government for emergency health and welfare needs.

This section is also intended to encourage and support efforts to help foreign-born legal residents of the state of Colorado to become citizens of the United States.

Entry requirements. A qualified alien who entered the United States before August 22, 1996, and who meets the eligibility criteria specified for a particular public assistance program shall be eligible to receive public assistance under the following programs as described in this article:

The Colorado works program;

The old age pension;

Aid to the needy disabled; or

Aid to the blind.

Five-year bar on receipt of benefits. A qualified alien who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, shall be barred from receiving the benefits described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) for a period of five years after the date of entry into the United States, unless he or she meets the exceptions set forth in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, as amended.

Deeming of sponsor income and resources. After five years, a qualified alien described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) shall be eligible for benefits under this article, but shall have sponsor income and resources deemed to the individual or family under rules established by the state department pursuant to section 26-2-137 (2).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1384), ch. 218, p. 952, § 2, effective July 1, 2010.)

(3.5) For benefits provided on and after January 1, 2014, the state department may pursue repayment from the qualified alien's sponsor for old age pension benefits provided to the qualified alien during the time that the sponsorship affidavit of support is in effect as determined by United States citizenship and immigration services, or its successor agency.

A qualified alien may receive benefits under section 26-2-122.3 pursuant to rules promulgated by the state department.

As a condition of eligibility for public assistance under this article, a qualified alien shall agree to refrain from executing an affidavit of support for the purpose of sponsoring an alien on or after July 1, 1997, under rules promulgated by the immigration and naturalization service or its successor agency during the pendency of the qualified alien's receipt of public assistance. Nothing in this subsection (5) shall be construed to affect a qualified alien's eligibility for public assistance under this article based upon the qualified alien's responsibilities under an affidavit of support entered into before July 1, 1997.

The state department shall encourage a qualified alien who is eligible to submit an application for citizenship to submit such an application.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1252, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) amended, (HB 10-1384), ch. 218, p. 952, § 2, effective July 1; (4) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2116, § 154, effective August 11; (3.5) added, (HB 10-1384), ch. 218, p. 955, § 5, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(3.5) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1410, § 94, effective May 25.

26-2-112. Old age pensions for inmates of public institutions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the application procedure, the investigation of applications, the procedure for granting of pensions, and all other provisions of this article relating to the administration of old age pensions shall apply to the class of old age pensions provided in section 26-2-111 (2)(a)(III).

Where an inmate of an institution, not penal in character, maintained by the state or by a municipality therein or county thereof, meets the requirements for the class of old age pensions provided in section 26-2-111 (2)(a)(III) and has been committed to said public institution by order of the district or probate court, the superintendent or chief administrative officer of such institution shall make application for such pension for and in behalf of said inmate in the same manner as provided in section 26-2-106.

Assistance payments under the old age pension granted to an inmate of the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo, Colorado, or the Wheat Ridge regional center, the Pueblo regional center, or the Grand Junction regional center shall be paid to the chief financial officer of the institution within which the inmate is confined. Such chief financial officer shall receive and disburse such pension funds as trustee for such inmate and shall account for the same to the state controller in the manner now prescribed by law for the handling and accounting of trust or quasi-trust funds.
(3) (a) (I) Assistance payments under the old age pension granted to an inmate of the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo, Colorado, or the Wheat Ridge regional center, the Pueblo regional center, or the Grand Junction regional center shall be paid to the chief financial officer of the institution within which the inmate is confined. Such chief financial officer shall receive and disburse such pension funds as trustee for such inmate and shall account for the same to the state controller in the manner now prescribed by law for the handling and accounting of trust or quasi-trust funds.

Such chief financial officer shall be required to furnish, at the state's expense, a surety bond in such amount as the department of human services shall from time to time deem sufficient in the premises to protect such funds.

It is the duty of such chief financial officer to pay monthly from the assistance payments under the old age pension, as prior claim therefrom, all lawful claims of said public institution for the care, support, maintenance, education, and treatment of said inmate in accordance with article 92 of title 27, C.R.S.

Where assistance payments under the old age pension are granted to an inmate of an institution maintained by any county or municipality, such payments shall be paid to such conservator or guardian as the district or probate court of such county may appoint, and under and amendable to the statutes applicable to conservators and guardians when so appointed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1186, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-12.

L. 83:

(3)(a)(I) amended, p. 1160, § 19, effective April 26.

L. 91:

(3)(a)(I) amended, p. 1145, § 13, effective May 18.

L. 94:

(3)(a)(II) amended, p. 2703, § 261, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3)(a)(III) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 803, § 73, effective April 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.